Georgia, session 2025_26, SB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 23 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Georgia Hemp
Farming Act," is amended by revising Code Section 2-23-6.3, relating to wholesale
consumable hemp establishment licenses, as follows:
"2-23-6.3.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, consideration, issuance, and revocation
of wholesale consumable hemp licenses issued by the department pursuant to this Code
S. B. 229
- 1 -

LC 55 0497
section shall be accomplished in accordance with Chapter 5 of this title, and such licenses
shall otherwise be governed by such chapter.
(b) Applications for a wholesale consumable hemp license shall be made on a form
furnished by the Commissioner and, together with such other information as the
Commissioner may require, shall state:
(1) The name of the applicant;
(2) The business address of the applicant;
(3) The complete telephone number and email address of the applicant;
(4) The location of the facility where the applicant will store consumable hemp products
and otherwise operate as a wholesaler of consumable hemp products in this state and
whether such facility is owned or leased by the applicant; and
(5) If the applicant is a business entity, the name of the owners, partners, members, or
shareholders of such entity.
(c) Wholesale consumable hemp licenses shall be issued by the department for one
calendar year at an annual licensing fee of at least $500.00 but not more than $10,000.00,
as established by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may establish separate classes of
wholesale consumable hemp licenses based on the amount of consumable hemp products
to be sold by the licensee, and the annual licensing fees required by this subsection shall
be in different amounts for each such separate class of wholesale consumable hemp
licenses.
(d) Wholesale consumable hemp licenses issued by the department pursuant to this Code
section shall be issued in connection with a single facility where the licensee will store
consumable hemp products or otherwise operate as a wholesaler of consumable hemp
products. For a person to store consumable hemp products or otherwise operate as a
wholesaler of consumable hemp products at multiple facilities, such person shall be
required to obtain from the department separate wholesale consumable hemp licenses for
each such facility.
S. B. 229
- 2 -

LC 55 0497
(e) No wholesale consumable hemp license shall be issued by the department pursuant to
this Code section to any person that is a licensed wholesale dealer of alcoholic beverages
under the provisions of Title 3 or to any person that is affiliated with such a licensed
wholesale dealer."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 3 of Title 3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to regulation of
alcoholic beverages generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"3-3-35.
No licensed wholesale dealer shall sell or otherwise distribute consumable hemp products,
as such term is defined in Code Section 2-23-3."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 229
- 3 -